Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,370
Operation; noise; limitation.

No person shall operate within the speed limits specified in this section either a motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight of ten thousand pounds or more or any combination of vehicles of a type subject to registration, towed by such motor vehicle, at any time or under any condition of grade, load, acceleration, or deceleration in such manner as to exceed the following noise limit based on a distance of not less than fifty feet from the centerline of travel under test procedures established by section 60-6,372: When the posted speed limit is thirty-five miles per hour or less, the noise limit shall not exceed 86dB(A), and when the posted speed limit is more than thirty-five miles per hour, the noise limit shall not exceed 90dB(A). This section shall apply to the total noise from a vehicle or combination of vehicles and shall not be construed as limiting or precluding the enforcement of any other provisions of sections 60-6,363 to 60-6,374 relating to motor vehicle mufflers for noise control.

Laws 1972, LB 1360, § 8;

Laws 1976, LB 823, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-2208;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 466.